California, session 20252026, SB242.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares as follows:(a) Existing state law requires insurance companies that sell Medicare supplement coverage, also known as Medigap coverage, to issue that insurance on a guaranteed-issue basis to eligible individuals without adjusting premiums based on medical underwriting, as long as their applications are submitted within a one-time open enrollment period.(b) The open enrollment period in the state is during the six-month window beginning when the individual is enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part B. After this open enrollment period, there is no guarantee that Medigap coverage will be issued to individuals with preexisting medical conditions unless the individual satisfies certain conditions, and even if the coverage is issued, the premium may be significantly higher.(c) As a result, it is extremely difficult for individuals whose health conditions or financial situations may have changed after their open enrollment period to switch to another Medicare supplement coverage plan that is more suitable.(d) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature in enacting this act to do both of the following:(1) Establish an annual open enrollment for applicants, and require Medigap coverage issuers in California to accept an individual’s application for coverage or an application to switch to another eligible plan during that period.(2) Prohibit issuers from denying the applicant Medigap coverage or making any premium rate distinctions due to any of the following:(A) Health status.(B) Claims experience.(C) Medical condition.(D) Whether the applicant is receiving health care services.SEC. 2. Section 1358.11 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1358.11. (a) (1) An issuer shall not deny or condition the offering or effectiveness of any Medicare supplement contract available for sale in this state, nor discriminate in the pricing of a contract because of the health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, or medical condition of an applicant in the case of an application for a contract that is submitted prior to or during the six-month period beginning with the first day of the first month in which an individual is both 65 years of age or older and is enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part B. Each Medicare supplement contract currently available from an issuer shall be made available to all applicants who qualify under this subdivision and who are 65 years of age or older.(2) (A) An issuer shall make available Medicare supplement benefit plans A, B, C, and F, if currently available, to an applicant who qualifies under this subdivision, who is 64 years of age or younger. An issuer shall also make available to those applicants Medicare supplement benefit plan K or L, if currently available, or Medicare supplement benefit plan M or N, if currently available. The selection between Medicare supplement benefit plan K or L and the selection between Medicare supplement benefit plan M or N shall be made at the issuer’s discretion.(B) For contracts sold or issued on or after January 1, 2020, to newly eligible Medicare beneficiaries, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1358.92, an issuer shall make available Medicare supplement benefit plans A, B, D, and G, if currently available, to applicants who qualify under this subdivision who are 64 years of age or younger. An issuer shall also make available to those applicants Medicare supplement benefit plan K or L, if currently available, or Medicare supplement benefit plan M or N, if currently available. The selection between Medicare supplement benefit plan K or L and the selection between Medicare supplement benefit plan M or N shall be made at the issuer’s discretion.(3) This Except for during the annual open enrollment period established under Section 1358.25, this section and Section 1358.12 do not prohibit an issuer in determining subscriber rates from treating applicants who are under 65 years of age and are eligible for Medicare Part B as a separate risk classification.(b) (1) If an applicant qualifies under subdivision (a) and submits an application during the time period referenced in subdivision (a) and, as of the date of application, has had a continuous period of creditable coverage of at least six months, the issuer shall not exclude benefits based on a preexisting condition.(2) If the applicant qualifies under subdivision (a) and submits an application during the time period referenced in subdivision (a) and, as of the date of application, has had a continuous period of creditable coverage that is less than six months, the issuer shall reduce the period of any preexisting condition exclusion by the aggregate of the period of creditable coverage applicable to the applicant as of the enrollment date. The manner of the reduction under this subdivision shall be as specified by the director.(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b) and Section 1358.23, Sections 1358.23 and 1358.25, subdivision (a) does not prevent the exclusion of benefits under a contract, during the first six months, based on a preexisting condition for which the enrollee received treatment or was otherwise diagnosed during the six months before the coverage became effective.(d) An individual enrolled in Medicare by reason of disability shall be entitled to open enrollment described in this section for six months after the date of their enrollment in Medicare Part B, or if notified retroactively of their eligibility for Medicare, for six months following notice of eligibility. Sales during the open enrollment period shall not be discouraged by any means, including the altering of the commission structure.(e) (1) An individual enrolled in Medicare Part B is entitled to open enrollment described in this section for six months following:(A) Receipt of a notice of termination or, if no notice is received, the effective date of termination from any employer-sponsored health plan including an employer-sponsored retiree health plan.(B) Receipt of a notice of loss of eligibility due to the divorce or death of a spouse or, if no notice is received, the effective date of loss of eligibility due to the divorce or death of a spouse, from any employer-sponsored health plan including an employer-sponsored retiree health plan.(C) Termination of health care services for a military retiree or the retiree’s Medicare eligible spouse or dependent as a result of a military base closure or loss of access to health care services because the base no longer offers services or because the individual relocates.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “employer-sponsored retiree health plan” includes any coverage for medical expenses, including coverage under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (COBRA) and the California Continuation Benefits Replacement Act (Cal-COBRA), that is directly or indirectly sponsored or established by an employer for employees or retirees, their spouses, dependents, or other included covered persons.(f) An individual enrolled in Medicare Part B is entitled to open enrollment described in this section if the individual was covered under a policy, certificate, or contract providing Medicare supplement coverage but that coverage terminated because the individual established residence at a location not served by the issuer.(g) (1) An individual whose coverage was terminated by a Medicare Advantage plan shall be entitled to an additional 60-day open enrollment period to be added on to and run consecutively after any open enrollment period authorized by federal law or regulation, for any and all Medicare supplement coverage available on a guaranteed basis under state and federal law or regulations for persons terminated by their Medicare Advantage plan.(2) Health plans that terminate Medicare enrollees shall notify those enrollees in the termination notice of the additional open enrollment period authorized by this subdivision. Health plan notices shall inform enrollees of the opportunity to secure advice and assistance from the HICAP in their area, along with the toll-free telephone number for HICAP.(h) (1) An individual shall be entitled to an annual open enrollment period lasting 60 days or more, commencing with the individual’s birthday, during which time that person may purchase any Medicare supplement coverage that offers benefits equal to or lesser than those provided by the previous coverage. During this open enrollment period, an issuer that falls under this paragraph shall not deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of Medicare supplement coverage, nor discriminate in the pricing of coverage, because of health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, or medical condition of the individual if, at the time of the open enrollment period, the individual is covered under another Medicare supplement policy, certificate, or contract. An issuer that offers Medicare supplement contracts shall notify an enrollee of their rights under this subdivision at least 30 and no more than 60 days before the beginning of the open enrollment period, and on any notice related to a benefit modification or premium adjustment.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following provisions apply:(A) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan A shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan A.(B) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan B shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan B.(C) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan C shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan C.(D) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan D shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan D.(E) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan E shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare benefit plan D.(F) (i) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan F shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare benefit plan F.(ii) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan F shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan F.(G) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan G shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan G.(H) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan H shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan D.(I) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan I shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan G.(J) (i) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan J shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan F.(ii) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan J shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan F.(K) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan K shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan K.(L) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan L shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan L.(M) New or innovative benefits, as described in subdivision (f) of Section 1358.9 and subdivision (f) of Section 1358.91, shall not be included when determining whether benefits are equal to or lesser than those provided by the previous coverage.(i) An individual enrolled in Medicare Part B is entitled to open enrollment described in this section upon being notified that, because of an increase in the individual’s income or assets, they meet one of the following requirements:(1) They are no longer eligible for Medi-Cal benefits.(2) They are only eligible for Medi-Cal benefits with a share of cost and certifies at the time of application that they have not met the share of cost.SEC. 3. Section 1358.25 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1358.25. (a) On and after January 1, 2026, 2027, an issuer of Medicare supplement coverage in this state shall not deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of any Medicare supplement coverage contract available for sale in the state, or discriminate in the pricing of the contract because of the health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, medical condition, or age of an applicant, except as specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), if an application for that coverage is submitted at either of the following times:(1) Before or during the six-month period beginning with the first day of the month in which an individual first enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part B, as described in subdivision (a) subdivisions (a) and (d) of Section 1358.11.(2) During an annual open enrollment period, including, but not limited to, the open enrollment period established in subdivision (b).(b) (1) An individual enrolled in Medicare Part B is entitled to a 90-day annual open enrollment period beginning on January 1 of each year, as described in this section.(2) During the open enrollment period established pursuant to this subdivision, applications shall be accepted for any Medicare supplement coverage available from an issuer.(3) The open enrollment period established pursuant to this section is a guaranteed issue period.(4) (A) (i) Premium rates offered to applicants during the open enrollment period established pursuant to this subdivision may vary based on the applicant’s age at the time of issue, but shall not vary based on the applicant’s attained age or actual age after the contract is issued. Age-based premiums shall be structured within specified age bands and no additional age bands shall be permitted. Age bands shall be fixed as follows:(I) Under age 65.(II) Age 65-69.(III) Age 70-79.(IV) Age 80 and over.(ii) The premium charged for the under age 65 age band shall be set relative to, and shall not exceed, 2 times the premium charged to the 65-69 age band for the same policy type and benefit level.(iii) The premium charged for the 70-79 age band shall be set relative to, and shall not exceed, 1.25 times the premium charged to the 65-69 age band for the same policy type and benefit level. Premiums shall not be increased due to age once coverage is in effect.(iv) The premium charged to the 80 and over age band shall not exceed 1.5 times the premium charged to the 65-69 age band for the same policy type and benefit level. Premiums shall not be increased due to age once coverage is in effect.(v) The premium charged to any lower age band, except the under age 65 age band, shall not exceed the premium charged to the immediately higher age band for the same policy type and benefit level.(B) Any other factors affecting ratesetting shall be applied uniformly and shall not result in indirect age-based discrimination.(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit denial of coverage or variation in premium based on gender, race, ethnicity, or any other factor listed in subdivision (a) of this section.SEC. 4. Section 10192.11 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:10192.11. (a) (1) An issuer shall not deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of any Medicare supplement policy or certificate available for sale in this state, nor discriminate in the pricing of a policy or certificate because of the health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, or medical condition of an applicant in the case of an application for a policy or certificate that is submitted prior to or during the six-month period beginning with the first day of the first month in which an individual is both 65 years of age or older and is enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part B. Each Medicare supplement policy and certificate currently available from an issuer shall be made available to all applicants who qualify under this subdivision and who are 65 years of age or older.(2) (A) An issuer shall make available Medicare supplement benefit plans A, B, C, and F, if currently available, to an applicant who qualifies under this subdivision, who is 64 years of age or younger. An issuer shall also make available to those applicants Medicare supplement benefit plan K or L, if currently available, or Medicare supplement benefit plan M or N, if currently available. The selection between Medicare supplement plan K or L and the selection between Medicare supplement benefit plan M or N shall be made at the issuer’s discretion.(B) For policies sold on or after January 1, 2020, to newly eligible Medicare beneficiaries, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.92, an issuer shall make available Medicare supplement benefit plans A, B, D, and G, if currently available, to applicants who qualify under this subdivision who are 64 years of age or younger. An issuer shall also make available to those applicants Medicare supplement benefit plan K or L, if currently available, or Medicare supplement benefit plan M or N, if currently available. The selection between Medicare supplement benefit plan K or L and the selection between Medicare supplement benefit plan M or N shall be made at the issuer’s discretion.(3) This Except for during the annual open enrollment period established under Section 10192.25, this section and Section 10192.12 do not prohibit an issuer in determining premium rates from treating applicants who are under 65 years of age and are eligible for Medicare Part B as a separate risk classification. This Except for during the annual open enrollment period established under Section 10192.25, this section does not prevent the exclusion of benefits for preexisting conditions as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10192.8 or paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10192.81.(b) (1) If an applicant qualifies under subdivision (a) and submits an application during the time period referenced in subdivision (a) and, as of the date of application, has had a continuous period of creditable coverage of at least six months, the issuer shall not exclude benefits based on a preexisting condition.(2) If the applicant qualifies under subdivision (a) and submits an application during the time period referenced in subdivision (a) and, as of the date of application, has had a continuous period of creditable coverage that is less than six months, the issuer shall reduce the period of any preexisting condition exclusion by the aggregate of the period of creditable coverage applicable to the applicant as of the enrollment date. The manner of the reduction under this subdivision shall be as specified by the commissioner.(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b) and Section 10192.23, Sections 10192.23 and 10192.25, subdivision (a) does not prevent the exclusion of benefits under a policy, during the first six months, based on a preexisting condition for which the policyholder or certificate holder received treatment or was otherwise diagnosed during the six months before the coverage became effective.(d) An individual enrolled in Medicare by reason of disability shall be entitled to open enrollment described in this section for six months after the date of their enrollment in Medicare Part B, or if notified retroactively of their eligibility for Medicare, for six months following notice of eligibility. Every issuer shall make available to every applicant qualified for open enrollment all policies and certificates offered by that issuer at the time of application. An issuer shall not discourage sales during the open enrollment period by any means, including the altering of the commission structure.(e) (1) An individual enrolled in Medicare Part B is entitled to open enrollment described in this section for six months following:(A) Receipt of a notice of termination or, if no notice is received, the effective date of termination from any employer-sponsored health plan including an employer-sponsored retiree health plan.(B) Receipt of a notice of loss of eligibility due to the divorce or death of a spouse or, if no notice is received, the effective date of loss of eligibility due to the divorce or death of a spouse, from any employer-sponsored health plan including an employer-sponsored retiree health plan.(C) Termination of health care services for a military retiree or the retiree’s Medicare eligible spouse or dependent as a result of a military base closure or loss of access to health care services because the base no longer offers services or because the individual relocates.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “employer-sponsored retiree health plan” includes any coverage for medical expenses, including, but not limited to, coverage under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (COBRA) and the California Continuation Benefits Replacement Act (Cal-COBRA), that is directly or indirectly sponsored or established by an employer for employees or retirees, their spouses, dependents, or other included insureds.(f) An individual enrolled in Medicare Part B is entitled to open enrollment described in this section if the individual was covered under a policy, certificate, or contract providing Medicare supplement coverage but that coverage terminated because the individual established residence at a location not served by the plan.(g) An individual whose coverage was terminated by a Medicare Advantage plan shall be entitled to an additional 60-day open enrollment period to be added on to and run consecutively after any open enrollment period authorized by federal law or regulation, for any Medicare supplement coverage provided by a Medicare supplement issuer and available on a guaranteed basis under state and federal law or regulation for persons terminated by their Medicare Advantage plan.(h) (1) An individual shall be entitled to an annual open enrollment period lasting 60 days or more, commencing with the individual’s birthday, during which time that person may purchase any Medicare supplement policy that offers benefits equal to or lesser than those provided by the previous coverage. During this open enrollment period, an issuer that falls under this paragraph shall not deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of Medicare supplement coverage, nor discriminate in the pricing of coverage, because of health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, or medical condition of the individual if, at the time of the open enrollment period, the individual is covered under another Medicare supplement policy or contract. An issuer shall notify a policyholder of their rights under this subdivision at least 30 and no more than 60 days before the beginning of the open enrollment period, and on any notice related to a benefit modification or premium adjustment.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following provisions apply:(A) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan A shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan A.(B) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan B shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan B.(C) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan C shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan C.(D) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan D shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan D.(E) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan E shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare benefit plan D.(F) (i) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan F shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare benefit plan F.(ii) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan F shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan F.(G) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan G shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan G.(H) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan H shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan D.(I) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan I shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan G.(J) (i) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan J shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan F.(ii) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan J shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan F.(K) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan K shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan K.(L) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan L shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan L.(M) New or innovative benefits, as described in subdivision (f) of Section 10192.9 and subdivision (f) of Section 10192.91, shall not be included when determining whether benefits are equal to or lesser than those provided by the previous coverage.(i) An individual enrolled in Medicare Part B is entitled to open enrollment described in this section upon being notified that, because of an increase in the individual’s income or assets, they meet one of the following requirements:(1) They are no longer eligible for Medi-Cal benefits.(2) They are only eligible for Medi-Cal benefits with a share of cost and certifies at the time of application that they have not met the share of cost.SEC. 5. Section 10192.25 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10192.25. (a) On and after January 1, 2026, 2027, an issuer of Medicare supplement coverage in this state shall not deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of any Medicare supplement coverage policy or certificate available for sale in the state, or discriminate in the pricing of the policy or certificate because of the health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, medical condition, or age of an applicant, except as specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), if an application for that coverage is submitted at either of the following times:(1) Before or during the six-month period beginning with the first day of the month in which an individual first enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part B, as described in subdivision (a) subdivisions (a) and (d) of Section 10192.11.(2) During an annual open enrollment period, including, but not limited to, the open enrollment period established in subdivision (b).(b) (1) An individual enrolled in Medicare Part B is entitled to a 90-day annual open enrollment period beginning on January 1 of each year, as described in this section.(2) During the open enrollment period established pursuant to this subdivision, applications shall be accepted for any Medicare supplement coverage available from an issuer.(3) The open enrollment period is a guaranteed issue period.(4) (A) (i) Premium rates offered to applicants during the open enrollment period established pursuant to this subdivision may vary based on the applicant’s age at the time of issue, but shall not vary based on the applicant’s attained age or actual age after the contract is issued. Age-based premiums shall be structured within specified age bands and no additional age bands shall be permitted. Age bands shall be fixed as follows:(I) Under age 65.(II) Age 65-69.(III) Age 70-79.(IV) Age 80 and over.(ii) The premium charged for the under age 65 age band shall be set relative to, and shall not exceed, 2 times the premium charged to the 65-69 age band for the same policy type and benefit level.(iii) The premium charged for the 70-79 age band shall be set relative to, and shall not exceed, 1.25 times the premium charged to the 65-69 age band for the same policy type and benefit level. Premiums shall not be increased due to age once coverage is in effect.(iv) The premium charged to the 80 and over age band shall not exceed 1.5 times the premium charged to the 65-69 age band for the same policy type and benefit level. Premiums shall not be increased due to age once coverage is in effect.(v) The premium charged to any lower age band, except the under age 65 age band, shall not exceed the premium charged to the immediately higher age band for the same policy type and benefit level.(B) Any other factors affecting ratesetting shall be applied uniformly and shall not result in indirect age-based discrimination.(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit denial of coverage or variation in premium based on gender, race, ethnicity, or any other factor listed in subdivision (a) of this section.SEC. 6. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.